Maryland, session 2026, SB0559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
(a) In this section, “Program” means the Recreational Fishery Data Collection
Program.
(b) On or before December 31, 2026, the Department of Natural Resources shall
establish the Recreational Fishery Data Collection Program.
(c) The purpose of the Program is to develop and implement a data collection
system for recreational anglers in the State.
(d) In coordination with State and federal partners, the Department of Natural
Resources shall:
(1) survey and collect data on recreational fishing reporting programs in
other states; and
(2) subject to available funding, enter into a contract for the development
and implementation of a data collection system for recreational anglers.
(e) On or before December 31, 2027, the Department of Natural Resources shall
report to the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment and the House
Environment and Transportation Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, on the findings of the Program, including a workplan detailing the
proposed development and implementation of a data collection system for recreational
anglers.
Article – Natural Resources
4–745.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section and § 4–217
of this title, a person may not fish for finfish in the Chesapeake Bay or in its tributaries up
to tidal boundaries or in State waters of the Atlantic Ocean and the Atlantic coastal bays
and their tributaries without first obtaining a Chesapeake Bay and coastal sport fishing
license or registration issued under subsection (d)(3) of this section and possessing the
license or registration.
(f) Every person licensed under this section shall submit any report the
Department requires in accordance with Department regulations.
(G) (1) EVERY PERSON WHO CATCHES STRIPED BASS UNDER A
CHESAPEAKE BAY AND COASTAL SPORT FISHING LICENSE OR REGISTRATION SHALL
REPORT THE CATCH TO THE DEPARTMENT.

SENATE BILL 559 3
(2) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY
OUT THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL:
1. AUTHORIZE REPORTING METHODS THAT THE
DEPARTMENT DETERMINES TO BE FEASIBLE;
2. TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT FEASIBLE, AUTHORIZE A
PERSON TO REPORT THE CATCH THROUGH A MOBILE APPLICATION; AND
3. ESTABLISH A REPORTING METHOD THAT IS USABLE
BY PERSONS WHO DO NOT HAVE INTERNET ACCESS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January July 1, 2027. 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and 6 months
and, at the end of December 31, 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.